California, session 20252026, AB1350.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 340 of the Unemployment Insurance Code is amended to read:340. (a) (1) The department shall provide a plan for assessing the effectiveness of its fraud prevention and detection tools by May 1, 2022, to the Senate Committee on Labor, Public Employment and Retirement, the Assembly Committee on Insurance, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Assembly Committee on Budget, and the Joint Legislative Audit Committee.(2) The department shall provide a report with an update on its progress on performing the assessment that the plan identified pursuant to paragraph (1) by July 1, 2022, to the Senate Committee on Labor, Public Employment and Retirement, the Assembly Committee on Insurance, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Assembly Committee on Budget, and the Joint Legislative Audit Committee.(b) (1) On or before January 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, until January 1, 2026, the department shall analyze and assess the effectiveness of its fraud prevention and detection tools and shall submit this analysis and assessment to the Senate Committee on Labor, Public Employment and Retirement, the Assembly Committee on Insurance, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Assembly Committee on Budget, and the Joint Legislative Audit Committee. Details on fraud methods and tools may be generalized, excluded, or redacted to protect the fraud deterrence practices of the department.(2) Commencing on January 1, 2027, and biennially thereafter, the department shall analyze and assess the effectiveness of its fraud prevention and detection tools and shall submit this analysis and assessment to the legislative committees specified in paragraph (1) and pursuant to paragraph (1).(c) The plan, assessments, and reports required by this section shall be provided consistent with the requirements of Section 9795 of the Government Code.